Missouri, session 2026, HB3423.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 105.464, 105.483, 105.489, 476.180, and 476.560, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 105.464,
105.483, 105.489, 476.180, and 476.560, to read as follows:
105.464. 1. No person serving in a judicial or quasi-judicial capacity shall participate
in such capacity in any proceeding in which the person knows that a party is any of the
following: the person or the person's great-grandparent, grandparent, parent, stepparent,
guardian, foster parent, spouse, former spouse, child, stepchild, foster child, ward, niece,
nephew, brother, sister, uncle, aunt, or cousin, or a person who gave any thing of value to
the judge.
2. No provision in the section shall be construed to prohibit him from entering an
order disqualifying himself or herself or transferring the matter to another court, body, or
person for further proceedings.
105.483. Each of the following persons shall be required to file a financial interest
statement:
(1) Associate circuit judges, circuit court judges, judges of the courts of appeals and
of the supreme court, and candidates for any such office;
(2) Persons holding an elective office of the state, whether by election or
appointment, and candidates for such elective office, except those running for or serving as
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3423 2
county committee members for a political party pursuant to section 115.609 or section
115.611;
(3) The principal administrative or deputy officers or assistants serving the governor,
lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state auditor and attorney general,
which officers shall be designated by the respective elected state official;
(4) The members of each board or commission and the chief executive officer of each
public entity created pursuant to the constitution or interstate compact or agreement and the
members of each board of regents or curators and the chancellor or president of each state
institution of higher education;
(5) The director and each assistant deputy director and the general counsel and the
chief purchasing officer of each department, division and agency of state government;
(6) Any official or employee of the state authorized by law to promulgate rules and
regulations or authorized by law to vote on the adoption of rules and regulations;
(7) Any member of a board or commission created by interstate compact or
agreement, including the executive director and any Missouri resident who is a member of the
bi-state development agency created pursuant to sections 70.370 to 70.440;
(8) Any board member of a metropolitan sewer district authorized under Section 30
(a) of Article VI of the State Constitution;
(9) Any member of a commission appointed or operating pursuant to sections 64.650
to 64.950, sections 67.650 to 67.658, or sections 70.840 to 70.859;
(10) The members, the chief executive officer and the chief purchasing officer of each
board or commission which enters into or approves contracts for the expenditure of state
funds;
(11) Each elected official, candidate for elective office, the chief administrative
officer, the chief purchasing officer and the general counsel, if employed full time, of each
political subdivision with an annual operating budget in excess of one million dollars, and
each official or employee of a political subdivision who is authorized by the governing body
of the political subdivision to promulgate rules and regulations with the force of law or to
vote on the adoption of rules and regulations with the force of law; unless the political
subdivision adopts an ordinance, order or resolution pursuant to subsection 4 of section
105.485;
(12) Any person who is designated as a decision-making public servant by any of the
officials or entities listed in subdivision (6) of section 105.450;
(13) Any person selected by the state auditor as an applicant to be considered by the
majority leader and minority leader of the senate for the post of nonpartisan state
demographer pursuant to Article III, Section 3 of the Missouri Constitution;

HB 3423 3
(14) Any member of a commission appointed or operating under Article V,
Section 25(d) of the Constitution of Missouri.
105.489. The financial interest statements required to be filed pursuant to the
provisions of sections 105.483 to 105.492, other than pursuant to subsection 4 of section
105.485, shall be filed with the appropriate filing officer or officers. For the purpose of
sections 105.483 to 105.492, the term "filing officer" is defined as:
(1) In the case of state elected officials and candidates for such office, judges of
courts of law and all other state officials and employees, the filing officer is the commission;
(2) [In the case of judges of courts of law, the filing officer shall be the clerk of the
supreme court. Financial interest statements filed by judges shall be made available for
public inspection unless otherwise provided by supreme court rule;
(3)] In the case of persons holding elective office in any political subdivision and
candidates for such offices, and in the case of all other officers or employees of a political
subdivision, the filing officer shall be the commission.
476.180. No judge of any court of record, who is interested in any suit or related to
either party, or who shall have been of counsel in any suit or proceeding pending before [him]
the judge, shall, without the express consent of the parties thereto, sit on the trial or
determination thereof. No judge of any court of record shall sit on any proceeding before
the court where the judge received any thing of value from a party or attorney of record
involved in the proceeding.
476.560. Except as provided in section 476.540, the benefits under sections 476.515
to 476.570 shall not apply to any judge who violates the provisions of section 476.180 or
has been convicted of a felony in any court or who has been removed from office by
impeachment or for misconduct or disbarred from the practice of law.
✔